Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.131

Change of registered agent for service of process.

A limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership may change its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change in accordance with RCW 23.95.430.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6105; 2009 c 188 s 115.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.